Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Private Loans for Clean Water Projects

§ 4781.
Eligibility and loan application.

The Vermont Economic Development Authority (VEDA) is authorized to make loans on behalf of the State to private entities for a clean water project; provided, however, that no State funds are used. Such loans shall be issued and administered by VEDA pursuant to this subchapter.

A private entity may apply to VEDA for a loan from the Vermont Environmental Protection Agency Pollution Control Revolving Fund, established in section 4753 of this title, for a clean water project. The loan proceeds shall be used to acquire, design, plan, construct, enlarge, repair, improve, or implement a clean water project. Loan proceeds shall not be used for operation and maintenance expenses or laboratory fees for monitoring.

The Secretary and VEDA may prescribe any form of application or procedure for a loan hereunder, request from an applicant any information deemed necessary to implement this subchapter, and impose an application fee and an administrative fee determined reasonable and necessary to cover administrative costs. Fee proceeds shall be deposited in the administrative fee account established in subsection 4755(a) of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4782.
Conditions of loan agreement.

VEDA may make loans to applicants on behalf of the State for one or more of the purposes set forth in subsection 4781(b) of this title. Each loan shall be made subject to the following conditions:

The loan shall be evidenced by a note payable over a term not to exceed 30 years. Repayment shall commence not later than one year after completion of the project for which loan funds have been issued.

The loan shall be secured with assets as determined by VEDA. VEDA may also require that the applicant assign all or a portion of any revenues from the clean water project as security for the loan or may require the establishment of a reserve fund.

The rate of interest charged for loans shall be set by the State Treasurer, taking into consideration prevailing borrowing rates available to similarly situated applicants from private lenders and the administrative fees to be charged to applicants. VEDA, in cooperation with the Secretary, shall periodically recommend interest rates to be set by the State Treasurer that are the lowest practicable rates consistent with maintaining the long-term integrity of the Fund. The interest rate set by the State Treasurer may be less than the prevailing borrowing rates available to similarly situated applicants from private lenders, but not less than zero percent.

The loan agreement shall specify the terms and conditions of the loan and its repayment by the applicant, as well as other terms and conditions determined necessary by the Secretary and VEDA.

Disbursement of loan proceeds shall be based on certification to the Secretary and VEDA by the loan recipient demonstrating that the costs for which reimbursement is requested have been incurred and paid by the recipient. The recipient shall provide supporting evidence of payment upon the request of VEDA. Partial disbursements of loan proceeds shall be made not more frequently than monthly.

Interim financing charges or short-term interest costs may constitute an allowable cost of a project for which a loan is extended, provided VEDA approved in advance the terms, conditions, interest rate, and other related matters concerning the financing or interest cost. In the event short-term financing is unavailable to the applicant, VEDA may make interim loan disbursements not more frequently than monthly to the applicant and its general contractor as co-payees upon submission of a certified request for payment supported by actual invoices or other evidence satisfactory to VEDA of costs incurred.

VEDA shall have the right prior to making any disbursement of the loan proceeds to require confirmation from an independent registered professional engineer that any work has been performed according to project plans and specifications approved by the Secretary.

VEDA may require as part of the loan agreement that the applicant cause an audit of the project costs to be prepared and approved by VEDA prior to VEDA’s making final payment of the loan amount.

In the event of default, any amounts owed upon the loan shall be considered a debt for the purposes of

32 V.S.A. § 5932(4)

. VEDA may recover such debt pursuant to the setoff debt collection remedy established under

32 V.S.A. §§ 5933

and 5934.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4783.
Qualifications for eligibility; certification.

No loan to an applicant shall be made under this subchapter until:

The applicant has certified all of the following to VEDA:

all State and federal permits and licenses necessary to undertake the project for which financing has been sought will be obtained prior to the expenditure of construction funds under the loan;

the applicant has sufficient means to pay the principal and interest on the loans and to pay any anticipated costs of operating and maintaining the financed project;

if the applicant is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission under 30 V.S.A §§ 102 and 203(6), the applicant has obtained the following approvals, if such approvals are necessary for the project, and has provided VEDA with copies of those approvals:

the certificate of public good issued by the Public Utility Commission pursuant to

30 V.S.A. §§ 231

(public good) and 108 (approving the loan); and

the decision and order of the Public Utility Commission approving rates that are to be charged by the applicant.

the municipality or municipalities in which the clean water project is located have provided a letter of support for the project.

The Secretary has certified to VEDA that the applicant and the project qualify for financing or assistance under section 4784 of this title and that the project has priority for receipt of financial assistance.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4784.
Loan priorities.

The Secretary shall at least annually prepare and certify to VEDA a list of privately owned clean water projects, ranked in priority order, that are eligible for financial assistance under this subchapter.

In determining financing ability for clean water projects under this subchapter, the Secretary shall apply the criteria adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 1628

; provided, however:

No privately owned clean water project authorized under this subchapter shall be prioritized above a municipal clean water project.

No more than 20 percent of the funds identified in the annual State Intended Use Plan (IUP) and allocated for clean water projects may be used for loans to privately owned clean water projects, unless there occurs a surplus of funds, in which case those funds may be used to fund additional privately owned clean water projects.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4785.
Liability against default.

Under no circumstance shall the State become responsible for owning or operating a clean water project when the loan recipient defaults on a loan obligation or abandons the project.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4786.
Action for receivership.

Upon default of a loan, VEDA shall have the right to petition the Superior Court in the county in which the clean water project is located, or the Public Utility Commission for projects subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission, to appoint a receiver.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.

§ 4787.
Loan consolidation.

Loans, or the outstanding balance of loans, made for the purpose of preparing engineering plans for a project may be consolidated with any subsequent loans for construction.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 28, 2018.